dev/postposition/postposition.ne.dix
  <!-- मा; मा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सवैभन्दा; सवैभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सवैभन्दा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुताविक; मुताविक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुताविक__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अगाबै; अगाबै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अगाबै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पारी; पारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पारी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माथि; माथि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माथि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जसो; जसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जसो__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मार्फत्; मार्फत्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मार्फत्__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झैं; झैं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झैं__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देखिनै; देखिनै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देखिनै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अलावा; अलावा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अलावा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सामुन्ने; सामुन्ने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामुन्ने__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जसै; जसै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जसै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मनि; मनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मनि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थरी; थरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थरी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बमोजि; बमोजि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बमोजि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बेगर; बेगर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बेगर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भीत्र; भीत्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भीत्र__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वरुप; स्वरुप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वरुप__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पश्चात्; पश्चात्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पश्चात्__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्म; सम्म; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्म__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संगै; संगै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संगै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अगाडी; अगाडी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अगाडी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्तर्गत; अन्तर्गत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्तर्गत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ﻿हरु; ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="/﻿हरु__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हरु</l>
          <r>﻿हरु<s n=""/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संङ्ग; संङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संङ्ग__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछि-; पछि-; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछि-__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अगाडि; अगाडि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अगाडि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नजीकै; नजीकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नजीकै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संगसंगै; संगसंगै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संगसंगै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पिच्छे; पिच्छे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पिच्छे__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पश्चात; पश्चात; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पश्चात__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जति; जति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जति__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वरूप; स्वरूप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वरूप__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संगत; संगत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संगत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तक; तक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तक__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नीर; नीर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नीर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनुरुप; अनुरुप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनुरुप__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मारे; मारे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मारे__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वस्; वस्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वस्__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- द्बारा; द्बारा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="द्बारा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सग; सग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सग__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निम्नानुसार; निम्नानुसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निम्नानुसार__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नगिचै; नगिचै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नगिचै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देखिन; देखिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देखिन__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनुकुल; अनुकुल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनुकुल__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="मा"><i>मा</i><par n="मा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सवैभन्दा"><i>सवैभन्दा</i><par n="सवैभन्दा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मुताविक"><i>मुताविक</i><par n="मुताविक__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अगाबै"><i>अगाबै</i><par n="अगाबै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पारी"><i>पारी</i><par n="पारी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="माथि"><i>माथि</i><par n="माथि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जसो"><i>जसो</i><par n="जसो__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मार्फत्"><i>मार्फत्</i><par n="मार्फत्__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="झैं"><i>झैं</i><par n="झैं__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="देखिनै"><i>देखिनै</i><par n="देखिनै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अलावा"><i>अलावा</i><par n="अलावा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सामुन्ने"><i>सामुन्ने</i><par n="सामुन्ने__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जसै"><i>जसै</i><par n="जसै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मनि"><i>मनि</i><par n="मनि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="थरी"><i>थरी</i><par n="थरी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बमोजि"><i>बमोजि</i><par n="बमोजि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बेगर"><i>बेगर</i><par n="बेगर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="भीत्र"><i>भीत्र</i><par n="भीत्र__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वरुप"><i>स्वरुप</i><par n="स्वरुप__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पश्चात्"><i>पश्चात्</i><par n="पश्चात्__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्म"><i>सम्म</i><par n="सम्म__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="संगै"><i>संगै</i><par n="संगै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अगाडी"><i>अगाडी</i><par n="अगाडी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्तर्गत"><i>अन्तर्गत</i><par n="अन्तर्गत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="﻿हरु"><i></i><par n="/﻿हरु__"/></e>
    <e lm="संङ्ग"><i>संङ्ग</i><par n="संङ्ग__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पछि-"><i>पछि-</i><par n="पछि-__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अगाडि"><i>अगाडि</i><par n="अगाडि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="नजीकै"><i>नजीकै</i><par n="नजीकै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="संगसंगै"><i>संगसंगै</i><par n="संगसंगै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पिच्छे"><i>पिच्छे</i><par n="पिच्छे__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पश्चात"><i>पश्चात</i><par n="पश्चात__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जति"><i>जति</i><par n="जति__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वरूप"><i>स्वरूप</i><par n="स्वरूप__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="संगत"><i>संगत</i><par n="संगत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="तक"><i>तक</i><par n="तक__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="नीर"><i>नीर</i><par n="नीर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुरुप"><i>अनुरुप</i><par n="अनुरुप__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मारे"><i>मारे</i><par n="मारे__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वस्"><i>वस्</i><par n="वस्__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="द्बारा"><i>द्बारा</i><par n="द्बारा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सग"><i>सग</i><par n="सग__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="निम्नानुसार"><i>निम्नानुसार</i><par n="निम्नानुसार__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="नगिचै"><i>नगिचै</i><par n="नगिचै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="देखिन"><i>देखिन</i><par n="देखिन__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुकुल"><i>अनुकुल</i><par n="अनुकुल__pst"/></e>
